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CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC P0500/42 Vehicle Speed Sensor Malfunction
(No.1 SpeedSensor)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
TheNo. 1 speedsensordetects the rotationspeedof the transmissionoutputshaftandsendssignals to the
Engine and ECT ECU. The Engine and ECT ECU determines the vehicle speed based on these signals.
An AC voltage is generated in the vehicle speed sensor coil as the rotor mounted on the output shaft rotates,
and this voltage is sent to the Engine and ECT ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0500/42

No vehicle speed sensor signal to Engine and ECT ECU under
conditions (a) and (b):
(a)Neutral start switch isOFF
(b) Vehicle is being driven

SOpenorshort inNo. 1 speedsensorcircuit
SNo.1 speedsensor
SEngineandECTECU
A t t i t i i bl

Clutch or brake slips or gear broken
SAutomatic transmissionassembly
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze frame data using hand−held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions when
the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-
ning or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air−fuel ratio lean or rich, etc. at the time of the malfunction.

1 Connect hand−held tester and read value of vehicle speed value.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Start the engine and the hand−held tester main switch ON.
CHECK:
Drive the vehicle and read vehicle speed value.
OK:

Vehicle speed matches tester speed value

NG Check and replace Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−35).

OK

2 Check speedometer circuit (See page BE−2) .

NG Repair or replace speedometer circuit.

OK
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3 Check resistance between terminals SPD of Engine and ECT ECU connector and
body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door

(See page BO−1 27).
(b) Disconnect the cruise control ECU connector.
(c) Disconnect the connector of the Engine and ECT ECU.
(d) Shift the shift lever to neutral.
(e) Jack up the rear wheel on one side
(f) Turn ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Check voltage between terminals SPD of the Engine and ECT
ECU connector and body ground when the wheel is turned
slowly.
OK:

Voltage is generated intermittently

NG Check and repair harness and connector be-
tween combination meter and Engine and ECT
ECU.

OK

Check and replace Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−35).


